District of Columbia statutes.
31-3451.11

Immunity.

The Commissioner, the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation, or its employees or agents shall not be liable for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this chapter.

June 18, 2003, D.C. Law 14-312, § 111, 50 DCR 306
2001 Ed., § 31-3851.11.